Utah statutes.
59-14-301.5.   Commission action to suspend or revoke license.
(1) (a)  The commission shall suspend or revoke licenses to sell tobacco, as
required under Section 26-42-103 regarding suspension or revocation of a
license due to the sale of tobacco products to a person younger than 19 years
of age, upon receipt of notice of an enforcing agency's order or order of
default, finding a violation of Section 26-42-103.
(b)  The commission shall provide written notice of the suspension or
revocation to the licensee.
(2)  It is the duty of the enforcing agency to advise the commission of any
order or order of default finding a violation of Section 26-42-103, for which
suspension or revocation of the license is a penalty.
(3)  When the commission revokes a licensee's license under this section the
commission may not issue to the licensee, or to the business entity using the
license that is revoked, a license under Section 59-14-202 or 59-14-301 to
sell tobacco at the location for which the license was issued for one year
after the date of the violation for which the license was revoked.
